Hawaii, session 2025, HB298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that, according to a 2023 Pew Research study, a vast majority of Americans support term limits for legislators.  Concern regarding career politicians and the recent issues of public corruption have many residents worried about the status of legislative term limits.  While the residents have often called for legislative reform, one measure that has consistently not been adopted is term limits for legislators. The legislature also finds that at least fifteen states have limits on the number of years a person may serve as a member of the legislature during the person's lifetime, which range from eight to twelve years.  Given the legislature's part-time nature and the differences between the house of representatives and the senate, the twelve-year term limit between the two chambers would be most equitable. The purpose of this Act is to propose an amendment to article III, section 4, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii to limit the terms of members of the legislature to a maximum of twelve years in the house of representatives or senate, or both, for terms beginning on or after the general election of 2026, and to include a grandfather clause as to not disqualify those legislators who have already exceeded the proposed twelve-year limit. SECTION 2.  Article III, section 4, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended to read as follows: "ELECTION OF MEMBERS; TERM Section 4.  Each member of the legislature shall be elected at an election.  If more than one candidate has been nominated for election to a seat in the legislature, the member occupying that seat shall be elected at a general election.  If a candidate nominated for a seat at a primary election is unopposed for that seat at the general election, the candidate shall be deemed elected at the primary election.  The term of office of a member of the house of representatives shall be two years and the term of office of a member of the senate shall be four years [.]; provided that for terms beginning on or after the general election of 2026, no member of the legislature shall serve for more than twelve years total between the house of representatives or senate, or both.  The term of a member of the legislature shall begin on the day of the general election at which elected or if elected at a primary election, on the day of the general election immediately following the primary election at which elected.  For a member of the house of representatives, the term shall end on the day of the general election immediately following the day the member's term commences.  For a member of the senate, the term shall end on the day of the second general election immediately following the day the member's term commences." SECTION 3.  The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall a member of the Hawaii state legislature be limited to serving no more than twelve years in the Hawaii state house of representatives or senate, or both, for terms beginning on or after the general election of 2026?" SECTION 4.  Constitutional material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________